Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.530

Review of agency denial.

Whenever a state agency concludes that a public record is exempt from disclosure and denies a person opportunity to inspect or copy a public record for that reason, the person may request the attorney general to review the matter. The attorney general shall provide the person with his or her written opinion on whether the record is exempt.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to establish an attorney-client relationship between the attorney general and a person making a request under this section.

[ 1992 c 139 s 10. Formerly RCW 42.17.325.]